Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-152
Demand to institute judicial proceedings; recording; claimant's statement; recording.

(1) A person giving a demand to institute judicial proceedings to enforce a lien, after giving the demand, may record a copy of the demand in the office in which the lien was recorded. The demand must refer by record location to the recorded lien under which it was given, and state the date demand was given to institute judicial proceedings and the names of the owner and the claimant.

(2) A claimant who has received demand to institute judicial proceedings may record, in the office in which the lien was recorded, a statement that the total contract price is not yet due under the contract for which the lien was recorded. The statement must refer to the recorded lien by its record location and give the names of the owner and the claimant.

Laws 1981, LB 512, § 28.